Tennessee, session 114, SB1867.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 24-7-123(b)(3)(A), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(iii) Was employed by the department of children's services and the interview
was conducted under the supervision of a child advocacy center that meets the
requirements of § 9-4-213(a) or (b). A department of children's services employee
conducting a forensic interview under this subdivision (b)(3)(A)(iii) must meet all of the
requirements of subdivisions (b)(3)(B)-(H). This subdivision (b)(3)(A)(iii) terminates on
July 1, 2031.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1867
010020
- 1 -